src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"Second vowel shortening"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = eemeed : emedân, savvoon : savo 
Vx:0 <=> _ Vx: (Cns:+) (%^FCD:) (%^CSH:|%^WG:) ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) %^SVSH: ; !! eemeed : emedân sai4joos
    where Vx in ( e o a á u i y ä ) ;

	
!! **Tests**
!!€ kulluutt^SVSH>
!!€ kull0u0t0>
!!€ eemeed^CSH:0 ^SVSH:0 >ân
!!€ e0m0ed00>ân
!!€ kappeer^CSH:0 ^SVSH:0 >ân
!!€ ka0p0er00>ân


"Causative i deletion"
i2:0 <=> Cns: _ %> i3: Cns:+ %^SVSH: ;

!!€ feeri2>i3tt^SVSH
!!€ feer0>itt0

"Stem vowel:0 in front of â"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = aiguu:aaigâ
Vx:0 <=> Cns: _ ([%^ÁE:|%^ÁI:])                     â Cns:* Triggers:* [%>|.#.] ; 
          \%> _ (%^SV:) Cns: ([%^ÁE:|%^ÁI:]) %^FCD: â Cns:* Triggers:* [%>|.#.] ;  
    where Vx in ( â e o a á u i y ä) ;

! this rule should be generalised, we talk about a ban on o>u strings

"Stem â deleting"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = kandâ:kandii ... built without ^FVD (sigh)
â:0 <=> \%> _ :i [j|i] (%^WG:) (%^RVSH:) [%>|.#.]  ;
        \%> _ :i  Triggers:*              %>  [:i|:j] ; 

! +N+Pl+Nom: *
!!€ če^RVrdâi^WG>ih
!!€ če0rd0i0>ih

! +N+Pl+Gen:
!!€ če^RVrdâi^WG>j
!!€ če0rd0i0>j

! +N+Pl+Acc: ok
!!€ če^RVrdâi^WG>id 
!!€ če0rd0i0>jd

"Word final vowel deletion"
!!  **RULE: @RULENAME@** = This unfortunately both for word and stem vowel deletion just now.
Vx:0 <=> _  %^FVD: (%^WG:|%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:) (i) [.#.|%>] ;  ! SC
          where Vx in (â i);


!! *Tests:*
!!€ sollâ^FVD>ii
!!€ soll00>ii

!!€ a^RVlgâ^FVD^WG^CLENi>
!!€ a0lg0000i>i


! This test is wrong, it fails, but the form is correct: juvvii	juuvâš+N+Sg+Gen
! ju^RVh^RCâi^WG^CLEN>i
! ju0vv0i00>i

!!€ a^RVlgâi^FVD^WG^CLEN>i5
!!€ a0lg0i000>i

!! ### Suffix vowel rules

"Suffix vowel lengthening"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = long á in kissáást, nuorâ : nuorááin, hyeni:hyeneest
%^SV:Vx <=> :Vx (%^CLEN:) (%^VHIGH:|%^VBACK:) (%^RVSH:) (%>)  _ (Cns)  NotSuffixBorder:* %^SLEN:   ;  ! SV ! hyeneest
       where Vx in ( á o u e a i   y ä  ) ; !nuorâ : nuorááin


!! **Tests**
!!€ pa^RVrgo^SV^WG^VHIGH^SLEN
!!€ pa0rguu000

!!€ ke^RVrho^SV^WG^VHIGH^SLEN
!!€ ke0rhuu000

!!€ ki^RVssá^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ ki0ssáá000>st
!!€ mi^RVllo^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ mi0lloo000>st
!!€ huksi^SVm^SLEN>ist
!!€ huksiim0>ist
!!€ táál^RCu^SV^WG^RVSH^SLEN^SVLOW>st
!!€ táál0oo0000>st

"Suffix i5:j for lexicon APINA"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = salijn
i5:j  <=> Cns: i %> _ ; ! SV 


"Suffix i5:0 for loanwords"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = *timotein, Charlien*, not *timoteiin, Chariliein*, change (invariant) i5 to something else?
i5:0 <=> o   e %> _ ;  ! SUFF
		 Vow i %> _ ;  ! SUFF


"Suffix i:j for i and e-stems"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
i:j <=> [i: | e: | i2: | i3: ] Triggers:*   %> _ [l|d|n|m|g|t|%>|.#.|#];  ! SUFF


"Vowel copy in suffix"
%^VO:Vx <=> :Vx Triggers:* %> _ ; ! SUFF
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  for imperative Sg3, at least
	where Vx in ( a á i u o ) ;


!! ### Suffix consonant rules

"Adjective illative in -vân after u"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
j:v <=> :u u:  %> _ â n ; ! SUFF Trond la til : foran u pga u2

"Shortening u for vân illative"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
u:0 <=>      u _  %> :v ; ! SV
        u2: %> _ Cns:+ %^SVSH: ;

! Trond this fails xxx
! h á r d u2:0 > u t t ^SVSH:0
! hárdu2>utt^SVSH
! hárd0>utt0




"Potential vowel shortening for contract verbs"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  -áážep becomes -áš etc.
Vx:0 <=> Vx _ %> š [.#.|v|j] ; ! SV
	where Vx in (a á i o u ) ;


"Insertion of pleonastic hyphen"
!!  **RULE: @RULENAME@** = for compounding of two vowels *stovli-ijâ*
%#:%- <=> Vx _ :Vx ;! HYPH
    where Vx in (a e i o u ä á) ;


!! *Tests:*
!!€ skä^RVi4nâ^VBACK>đ
!!€ ska0inâ0>đ
!!€ hu^RVm^RCo^SVb^WG^RLEN^SLEN^RLEN^SLEN
!!€ huum0oob00000
